Nebraska, session 109, LB120.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 60-484.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-484.02 (1) Each applicant for an operator's license or state
identification card shall have his or her digital image captured. Digital
images shall be preserved for use as prescribed in sections 60-4,119, 60-4,151,
and 60-4,180. The images shall be used for issuing operators' licenses and
state identification cards. The images may be retrieved only by the Department
of Motor Vehicles for issuing renewal and replacement operators' licenses and
state identification cards and may not be otherwise released except in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Upon application for an operator's license or state identification
card, each applicant shall provide his or her signature in a form prescribed by
the department. Digital signatures shall be preserved for use on original,
renewal, and replacement operators' licenses and state identification cards and
may not be otherwise released except in accordance with subsection (4) of this
section.
(3)(a) (3) No officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department or
law enforcement officer shall release a digital image except:
(i) To (a) to a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency, a
certified law enforcement officer employed in an investigative position by a
federal, state, or local agency, or a driver licensing agency of another state
for the purpose of carrying out the functions of the agency or assisting
another agency in carrying out its functions upon the verification of the
identity of the person requesting the release of the information and the
verification of the purpose of the requester in requesting the release;
(ii) To or (b) to the office of the Secretary of State for the purpose of
voter registration and voter identification as prescribed in the Election Act
upon the verification of the identity of the person requesting the release of
the information and the verification of the purpose of the requester in
requesting the release; or .
(iii) To the Nebraska State Patrol in order to be posted on the Nebraska
State Patrol Missing Persons Clearinghouse website if the portrayed individual
has been deemed missing and cannot be located. The Nebraska State Patrol and
the Department of Motor Vehicles may enter into an agreement for the release,
use, protection, storage, and retention of such digital images in accordance
with this section and the Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act. The
Nebraska State Patrol shall do the following relating to digital images that
are released to the Nebraska State Patrol:
(A) Carry out protection protocols to prevent the fraudulent use of such
digital images;
(B) Create, and update as necessary, security measures for the access,
storage, and retention of such digital images; and
(C) Remove any such digital image from the Nebraska State Patrol Missing
Persons Clearinghouse website within three business days after the Nebraska
State Patrol is notified that the individual portrayed in such digital image
has been located.
(b) No employee or official in the office of the Secretary of State shall
release a digital image except to a federal, state, or local law enforcement
agency, a certified law enforcement officer employed in an investigative
position by a federal, state, or local agency, or a driver licensing agency of
another state for the purpose of carrying out the functions of the agency or
assisting another agency in carrying out its functions upon the verification of
the identity of the person requesting the release of the information and the
verification of the purpose of the requester in requesting the release.
(c) Any officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department, law
enforcement officer, or employee or official in the office of the Secretary of
State that knowingly discloses or knowingly permits disclosure of a digital
image in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(4)(a) (4) No officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department or
law enforcement officer shall release a digital signature except:
(i) To (a) to a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency, a
certified law enforcement officer employed in an investigative position by a
federal, state, or local agency, or a driver licensing agency of another state
for the purpose of carrying out the functions of the agency or assisting
another agency in carrying out its functions upon the verification of the
identity of the person requesting the release of the information and the
verification of the purpose of the requester in requesting the release; or
-1-

LB120 LB120
2025 2025
(ii) To (b) to the office of the Secretary of State for the purpose of
voter registration and voter identification as prescribed in the Election Act
upon the verification of the identity of the person requesting the release of
the information and the verification of the purpose of the requester in
requesting the release.
(b) No employee or official in the office of the Secretary of State shall
release a digital signature except to a federal, state, or local law
enforcement agency, a certified law enforcement officer employed in an
investigative position by a federal, state, or local agency, or a driver
licensing agency of another state for the purpose of carrying out the functions
of the agency or assisting another agency in carrying out its functions upon
the verification of the identity of the person requesting the release of the
information and the verification of the purpose of the requester in requesting
the release.
(c) Any officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department, law
enforcement officer, or employee or official in the office of the Secretary of
State that knowingly discloses or knowingly permits disclosure of a digital
signature in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class I
misdemeanor.
(5) The department shall develop a process for the release of digital
images to the Secretary of State for the purpose of voter identification as
prescribed by the Election Act. The process shall include proper measures for
access, security, storage, and retention of the digital image and verification
of the release of the digital image to any officer, agent, or contractor of the
Secretary of State. The Secretary of State and the department shall enter into
an agreement for the release, use, protection, storage, and retention of
digital images as prescribed under this section and the Uniform Motor Vehicle
Records Disclosure Act. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this subsection.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-484.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-